Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1607
Labor not an article of commerce.

The labor of a human being shall not be a commodity or article of commerce. Nothing contained in the Consumer Protection Act shall be construed to forbid the existence and operation of labor, agricultural, or horticultural organizations, instituted for the purposes of mutual help, and not having capital stock or conducted for profit, or to forbid or restrain individual members of such organizations from lawfully carrying out the legitimate objects thereof.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 14;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 22.